Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 11. General Provisions.

§ 3.2-1100.
Diversion of dedicated revenues.

The unexpended balances of the following special funds shall not be diverted or expended for any purpose other than each fund’s intended purpose. The special funds are:

Apple Fund (§

3.2-1206

);

Peanut Fund (§

3.2-1906

);

Plant Pollination Fund (§

3.2-2806

);

Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund (§

3.2-2905

);

Virginia Bright Flue-Cured Tobacco Promotion Fund (§

3.2-2407

);

Virginia Cattle Industry Fund (§

3.2-1305

);

Virginia Corn Fund (§

3.2-1411

);

Virginia Cotton Fund (§

3.2-1511

);

Virginia Dark-Fired Tobacco Promotion Fund (§

3.2-2407.1

);

Virginia Egg Fund (§

3.2-1605

);

Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund (§

3.2-1704

);

Virginia Marine Products Fund (§

3.2-2705

);

Virginia Milk Commission Assessments Fund (§

3.2-3220

);

Virginia Pork Industry Fund (§

3.2-2005

);

Virginia Potato Fund (§

3.2-1810

);

Virginia Sheep Industry Promotion and Development Fund (§

3.2-2111

);

Virginia Small Grains Fund (§

3.2-2211

);

Virginia Soybean Fund (§

3.2-2311

); and

Virginia Wine Promotion Fund (§

3.2-3005

).

No provision of this subtitle shall be construed to give any board the authority to expend funds for legislative or political activity.

History.

1970, c. 310, § 3.1-796.24; 1991, c. 498, § 3.1-6.1; 2004, cc. 89, 212, 319; 2008, c. 860; 2011, c. 158; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2016, c. 167; 2018, c. 469.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 158 substituted “Beef” for “Cattle” in subdivision A 6.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 27, are identical, and updated the section reference in subdivision A 9.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 167 deleted “unless authorized by a specific act of Assembly” following “intended purpose” in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 469 substituted “Virginia Cattle Industry Fund” for “Virginia Beef Industry Fund” in subdivision A 6.

§ 3.2-1101.
Commodity boards reporting requirements.

All commodity boards established within the Department shall report their activities to the Board on an annual basis. This report shall be in a format as prescribed by the Board. The Board may review activities of the commodity boards and make such recommendations concerning their programs as it deems fit.

History.

1985, c. 173, § 3.1-4.1; 2001, cc. 17, 398; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1102.
Collection of delinquent assessments; civil action.

Except as provided in §§

3.2-1721

,

3.2-1812

, and

3.2-2408

, the Tax Commissioner shall immediately notify any person who fails to pay an assessment pursuant to Part B of this subtitle and shall add a five percent penalty to the amount due. If such deficiency is not paid within 30 days after the date of such notice, then the amount of the deficiency shall bear interest, in accordance with §

58.1-15

, from the date the amount was due, and the Tax Commissioner shall collect any interest as part of the delinquent amount. If any person is delinquent in any payment of the money due or interest thereon, then the amount shall be collected by civil action in the name of the Commonwealth at the direction of the Tax Commissioner, and any person adjudged to be in default shall pay the cost of such action. The Attorney General, at the request of the Tax Commissioner, shall institute action in an appropriate court for the collection of any money due under Part B of this subtitle, including interest thereon. The Tax Commissioner may waive or remit such penalty, or portion thereof, in his discretion for good cause shown.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-525.14, 3-598.16; 1966, cc. 658, 702, §§ 3.1-660, 3.1-763.10; 1970, cc. 310, 431, §§ 3.1-684.16, 3.1-796.27; 1977, c. 396; 1980, cc. 316, 395 §§ 3.1-796.11:7, 3.1-1046; 1985, c. 237; 1991, c. 587, § 3.1-684.55; 1993, c. 809; 1995, c. 691, § 3.1-1079; 1997, c. 873, §§ 3.1-1098, 3.1-1102; 1999, c. 751; 2005, cc. 864, 875, § 3.1-636.10; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 27, are identical, and in the first sentence, deleted “and 3.2-2509” following “3.2-2408” and made a related change.

§ 3.2-1103.
Duty of law-enforcement officers.

It shall be the duty of all state and local law-enforcement officers to assist in the enforcement of this subtitle.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-239.11, 3-256; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-318, 3.1-335; 1970, c. 310, § 3.1-796.28; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1104.
Preemption by federal law.

No provision of Chapter 12 (§

3.2-1200

et seq.), Chapter 13 (§

3.2-1300

et seq.), Chapters 15 (§

3.2-1500

et seq.) through 21 (§

3.2-2100

et seq.), Chapter 23 (§

3.2-2300

et seq.), or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.) that is expressly preempted by a federal act or agreement governing commodity assessments shall be enforced or imposed until the termination of such act or agreement.

History.

2016, c. 565.

§ 3.2-1105.
Commodity boards; appointment terms; quorum.

The following provisions apply to each commodity board established pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 12 (§

3.2-1200

et seq.), Chapter 13 (§

3.2-1300

et seq.), Chapters 16 (§

3.2-1600

et seq.) through 19 (§

3.2-1900

et seq.), Chapter 21 (§

3.2-2100

et seq.), or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.):

The term for each appointment to a commodity board shall be for four years, with the exception of an appointment to fill a vacancy, which shall be for the unexpired term, unless otherwise authorized in this subtitle; and

A majority of the members of a commodity board shall constitute a quorum of that commodity board unless otherwise authorized in this subtitle.

History.

2016, c. 565; 2017, cc. 8, 66.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 565, cl. 5 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments to commodity boards listed in §

3.2-1105

of the Code of Virginia as created by this act for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made to such boards on and after July 1, 2016, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 8 and 66 are identical, and inserted “or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.)” at the end of the introductory paragraph and made related changes.

§ 3.2-1106.
Commodity board officers and reimbursement of expenses.

The following provisions apply to each commodity board established pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 12 (§

3.2-1200

et seq.), Chapter 13 (§

3.2-1300

et seq.), Chapters 15 (§

3.2-1500

et seq.) through 19 (§

3.2-1900

et seq.), Chapter 21 (§

3.2-2100

et seq.), or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.):

The members of a commodity board shall elect one board member as chairman and such other officers as deemed appropriate unless otherwise authorized in this subtitle; and

Each appointed member of a commodity board shall serve without compensation. Such commodity board may reimburse any of its members for actual expenses incurred in the performance of his duties unless otherwise authorized in this subtitle. Such reimbursements shall be made from the special funds established pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 12 (§

3.2-1200

et seq.), Chapter 13 (§

3.2-1300

et seq.), Chapters 15 (§

3.2-1500

et seq.) through 19 (§

3.2-1900

et seq.), Chapter 21 (§

3.2-2100

et seq.), or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.).

History.

2016, c. 565; 2017, cc. 8, 66.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 8 and 66 are identical, inserted “or Chapter 24 (§

3.2-2400

et seq.)” at the end of the introductory paragraph and subdivision 2 and made related changes.